California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 763, Sec. 6.   Effective September 30, 2008.   Note: See provisions clarifying this section's application in Sec. 8 of Stats. 2008, 1st Ex., Ch. 1, which took effect on Dec. 31, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17943.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the amount of the annual fee described in Section 17942 shall apply to the taxable year beginning January 1, 2001, and subsequent taxable years, notwithstanding the results of any study prepared by the Franchise Tax Board and submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to former Section 17943.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 391, Sec. 3.   Effective October 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17944.

(a) The effective date of dissolution, withdrawal, or cancellation of a limited liability company is the date on which the certified copy of the court decree, judgment, or order declaring the limited liability company duly wound up and dissolved is filed in the office of the Secretary of State or the date on which the certificate of winding up and dissolution is filed in the office of the Secretary of State. For the purposes of this chapter, the effective date of cancellation of registration of a foreign limited liability company is the
 date on which the certificate of cancellation of registration is filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

(b) The Secretary of State shall, through an information program and by forms and instructions, recommend that all required documents filed with the Secretary of State be sent, if mailed, by certified mail with return receipt requested. The Secretary of State shall also notify persons that receipt of documents by the Secretary of State will be acknowledged within 21 days of receipt.

(c) On or before 21 days after their receipt, the Secretary of State shall provide a payer with acknowledgment of the receipt of documents submitted by a limited liability company pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 952, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17946.

A limited liability company shall not be subject to the taxes and fees imposed by this chapter if the limited liability company did no business in this state during the taxable year and the taxable year was 15 days or less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 952, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17947.

(a) A limited liability company shall not be subject to the taxes imposed by this chapter for a taxable year if the limited liability company does all of the following:

(1) Files with the Franchise Tax Board a timely final annual tax return for the preceding taxable year.

(2) Does not do business in this state after the end of the taxable year for which the final annual tax return was filed.

(3) Files a certificate of dissolution with the Secretary of State, pursuant to Section 17707.08 of the Corporations Code, or a certificate of cancellation with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 17708.06 of the Corporations Code, before the end of the 12-month period beginning with the date the final annual tax return was filed.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “final annual tax return” is a return described in Section 18633.5 that is filed on or before the due date of the return, as extended, that the taxpayer designates in the manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board as the taxpayer’s final return for purposes of the tax imposed under this chapter. For purposes of this chapter, a “final annual tax return” is a return filed
 pursuant to Section 18633.5 where the taxpayer is not required to file a subsequent return to reflect the imposition of tax under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 27.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.7. Tax on Registered Limited Liability Partnerships and Foreign Limited Liability Partnerships [17948. - 17948.3.]

17948.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e), for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, every limited liability partnership doing business in this state (as defined in Section 23101) and required to file a return under Section 18633 shall pay annually to the Franchise Tax Board a tax for the privilege of doing business in this state in an amount equal to the applicable amount specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 23153 for the taxable year.

(b) In addition to any limited liability partnership that is doing business in this state and therefore is subject to the tax imposed by subdivision (a), for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, every registered limited liability partnership that has registered with the
 Secretary of State pursuant to Section 16953 of the Corporations Code and every foreign limited liability partnership that has registered with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 16959 of the Corporations Code shall pay annually the tax prescribed in subdivision (a). The tax shall be paid for each taxable year, or part thereof, until any of the following occurs:

(1) A notice of cessation is filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16954 or 16960 of the Corporations Code.

(2) A foreign limited liability partnership withdraws its registration pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 16960 of the Corporations Code.

(3) The registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership has been dissolved and finally wound up.

(c) The tax assessed under this section shall be due and payable on the date the return is required to be filed under Section 18633.

(d) If a taxpayer files a return with the Franchise Tax Board that is designated as its final return, the Franchise Tax Board shall notify the taxpayer that the annual tax shall continue to be due annually until a certificate of cancellation is filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 16954 or 16960 of the Corporations Code.

(e) (1) (A) Every limited liability partnership doing business in this state as described in subdivision (a) that registers with the Secretary of the State pursuant to subdivision (b) on or after January 1,
 2021, and before January 1, 2024, shall not be subject to the tax imposed under this section for its first taxable year.

(B) This subdivision shall become operative only for a taxable year in which any budget measure appropriates one dollar ($1) or more to the Franchise Tax Board for the costs associated with administration of this subdivision.

(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before January 1, 2030, every limited liability partnership required to file a return under Section 18633 shall, instead of the amount specified in Section 23153, pay the annual tax to this state in the amount of four hundred dollars ($400) for its first taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 27.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17948.2.

A registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership shall not be subject to the taxes and fees imposed by this chapter if the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership did no business in this state during the taxable year and the taxable year was 15 days or less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 952, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

17948.3.

(a) A registered limited liability partnership shall not be subject to the taxes imposed by this chapter for a taxable year if the registered limited liability partnership does all of the following:

(1) Files with the Franchise Tax Board a timely final annual tax return for the preceding taxable year.

(2) Does not do business within this state after the end of the taxable year for which the final annual tax
 return was filed.

(3) Files a notice in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 16954 or subdivision (b) of Section 16960 of the Corporations Code with the Secretary of State before the end of the 12-month period beginning with the date of the final annual tax return was filed.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “final annual tax return” is a return described in Section 18633 that is filed on or before the due date of the return, as extended, that the taxpayer designates in the manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board as the taxpayer’s final annual tax return for purposes of the tax imposed under this chapter. For purposes of this chapter, a “final annual tax return” is a return filed pursuant to Section 18633 where the taxpayer is not required to file a subsequent return to reflect the imposition of tax under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 53.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Gross Income of Nonresidents [17951. - 17955.]

17951.

(a) For purposes of computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17041, in the case of nonresident taxpayers the gross income includes only the gross income from sources within this state.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the gross income of a nonresident taxpayer does not include income not subject to the Personal Income Tax Law (Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2) by operation of
 the following federal laws:

(1) Section 11108 of Title 46, United States Code, relating to compensation for the performance of duties of certain merchant seamen.

(2) Section 11502 of Title 49, United States Code, relating to compensation of an employee of a rail carrier.

(3) Section 14503 of Title 49, United States Code, relating to compensation of an employee of a motor carrier.

(4) Section 40116 of Title 49, United States Code, relating to the pay of an employee of an air carrier.

(5) Section 571 of Title 50, Appendix, United States Code, relating to military compensation of service members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 62, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17952.

For purposes of computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17041, income of nonresidents from stocks, bonds, notes, or other intangible personal property is not income from sources within this state unless the property has acquired a business situs in this state, except that if a nonresident buys or sells such property in this state or places orders with brokers in this state to buy or sell such property so regularly, systematically, and continuously as to constitute doing business in
 this state, the profit or gain derived from such activity is income from sources within this state irrespective of the situs of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 920, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17952.5.

(a) For purposes of computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17041, gross income of a nonresident, as defined in Section 17015, from sources within this state shall not include “qualified retirement income” received on or after January 1, 1996, for any part of the taxable year during which the taxpayer was not a resident of
 this state.

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified retirement income” means income from any of the following:

(1) A qualified trust under Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code that is exempt under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code from taxation.

(2) A simplified employee pension as defined in Section 408(k) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) An annuity plan described in Section 403(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) An annuity contract described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(5) An individual retirement plan described in Section 7701(a)(37) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(6) An eligible deferred compensation plan as defined in Section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(7) A governmental plan as defined in Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(8) A trust described in Section 501(c)(18) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(9) Any plan, program, or arrangement described in Section 3121(v)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, or any plan, program, or arrangement that is in writing, that provides for retirement payments in recognition of prior service to be made to a retired partner, and that is in effect immediately before retirement begins, if that income is either of the following:

(A) Part of a series of substantially equal periodic payments (not less
 frequently than annually), which may include income described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, made for either of the following:

(i) The life or the life expectancy of the recipient (or the joint lives or joint life expectancies of the recipient and the designated beneficiary of the recipient).

(ii) A period of not less than 10 years.

(B) A payment received after termination of employment, under a plan, program, or arrangement to which that employment relates, maintained solely for the purpose of providing retirement benefits for employees in excess of the limitation imposed by Section 401(a)(17), 401(k), 401(m), 402(g), 403(b), 408(k), or 415 of the Internal Revenue Code, or any combination of those sections, or any other limitation on contributions or benefits in the Internal Revenue Code on plans to which any
 of those sections apply.

(C) The fact that payments may be adjusted, from time to time, pursuant to this plan, program, or arrangement to limit total disbursements under a predetermined formula, or to provide cost-of-living or similar adjustments, will not cause the periodic payments provided under that plan, program, or arrangement to fail the “substantially-equal-periodic-payments” test.

(10) Any retired or retainer pay of a member or former member of a uniform service computed under Section 1401 and following of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “retired partner” is an individual who is described as a partner in Section 7701(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code and who is retired under that individual’s partnership agreement.

(d) This section shall apply only to any taxable year, or portion thereof, that the provisions of Section 114 of Title 4 of the United States Code, relating to limitation on state income taxation of certain pension income, are effective.

(e) Except as otherwise provided, references to the Internal Revenue Code are subject to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 17024.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 35.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17953.

For purposes of computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17041, income of estates and trusts distributed or distributable to nonresident beneficiaries is income from sources within this state only if distributed or distributable out of income of the estate or trust derived from sources within this state. For the purposes of this section, the nonresident beneficiary shall be deemed to be the owner of intangible personal property from which the income of the estate or trust is
 derived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 920, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17954.

For purposes of computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17041, except as provided in Section 25141, gross income from sources within and without this state shall be allocated and apportioned under rules and regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 920, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17955.

(a) For purposes of computing “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17041, notwithstanding Sections 17951, 17952, and 17953, gross income of a nonresident (as defined in Section 17015) from sources within this state shall not include dividends, interest, or gains and losses from qualifying investment securities if any of the following apply:

(1) In the case of an individual, with respect to the qualifying
 investment securities, the taxpayer’s only contact with this state is through a broker, dealer, or investment adviser located in this state.

(2) In the case of a partner’s distributive share of income from qualifying investment securities, the partnership qualifies as an investment partnership, whether or not the partnership has a usual place of business located in this state.

(3) In the case of a beneficiary of a qualifying estate or trust, the taxpayer’s only contact with this state is through an investment account managed by a corporate fiduciary located in this state.

(4) In the case of a unit holder in a regulated investment company (as defined in Section 851 of the Internal Revenue Code), to the extent of the dividends distributed by the regulated investment company, whether or not the regulated investment
 company has a principal place of business in this state.

(b) This section shall not apply to income derived from investment activity that is interrelated with any trade or business activity of the nonresident or an entity in which the nonresident owns an interest in this state, whose primary activities are separate and distinct from the acts of acquiring, managing, or disposing of qualified investment securities, or if those securities were acquired with working capital of a trade or business activity conducted in this state in which the nonresident owns an interest.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Investment partnership” means a partnership that meets both of the following requirements:

(A) No less than 90 percent of the partnership’s cost of
 its total assets consist of qualifying investment securities, deposits at banks or other financial institutions, and office space and equipment reasonably necessary to carry on its activities as an investment partnership.

(B) No less than 90 percent of its gross income consists of interest, dividends, and gains from the sale or exchange of qualifying investment securities.

(2) “Qualifying estate or trust” means an estate or trust that meets both of the following requirements:

(A) No less than 90 percent of the estate’s or trust’s cost of its total assets consist of qualifying investment securities, deposits at banks or other financial institutions, and office space and equipment reasonably necessary to carry on its investment activities.

(B) No less
 than 90 percent of its gross income consists of interest, dividends, and gains from the sale or exchange of qualifying investment securities.

(3) (A) “Qualifying investment securities” include all of the following:

(i) Common stock, including preferred or debt securities convertible into common stock, and preferred stock.

(ii) Bonds, debentures, and other debt securities.

(iii) Foreign and domestic currency deposits or equivalents and securities convertible into foreign securities.

(iv) Mortgage- or asset-backed securities secured by federal, state, or local governmental agencies.

(v) Repurchase
 agreements and loan participations.

(vi) Foreign currency exchange contracts and forward and futures contracts on foreign currencies.

(vii) Stock and bond index securities and futures contracts, and other similar financial securities and futures contracts on those securities.

(viii) Options for the purchase or sale of any of the securities, currencies, contracts, or financial instruments described in clauses (i) to (vii), inclusive.

(ix) Regulated futures contracts.

(B) “Qualifying investment securities” does not include an interest in a partnership unless that partnership is itself an investment partnership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 920, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Credit for Taxes Paid [18001. - 18011.]

18001.

(a) Subject to the following conditions, residents shall be allowed a credit against the “net tax” (as defined by Section 17039) for net income taxes imposed by and paid to another state (not including any preference, alternative, or minimum tax comparable to the tax imposed by Section 17062) on income taxable under this part:

(1) The credit shall be allowed only for taxes paid to the other state (not including any preference, alternative, or minimum tax comparable to the tax
 imposed by Section 17062) on income derived from sources within that state which is taxable under its laws irrespective of the residence or domicile of the recipient.

This paragraph shall not apply to residents to whom subdivision (b) of Section 17014 applies.

(2) The credit shall not be allowed if the other state allows residents of this state a credit against the taxes imposed by that state (not including any preference, alternative, or minimum tax comparable to the tax imposed by Section 17062) for “net tax” (as defined by Section 17039) paid or payable under this part.

(3) The credit shall not exceed the proportion of the “net tax” (as defined by Section 17039) payable under this part as the income subject to tax in the other state (not including any preference, alternative, or minimum tax comparable to the tax imposed by Section
 17062) and also taxable under this part bears to the taxpayer’s entire income upon which the “net tax” (as defined by Section 17039) is imposed by this part.

(4) No credit shall be allowed under this section for any tax imposed by Section 17062.

(b) For purposes of this section, the amount of “net income taxes” paid to another state shall include the taxpayer’s pro rata share of any taxes on, or according to, or measured by, income or profits paid or accrued, which were paid by an S corporation, as provided by Section 18006.

(c) For purposes of this section, “income derived from sources within that state” shall be determined by applying the nonresident sourcing rules for determining income from sources within this state, as specified in Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 17951), and the regulations
 thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 374, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

18002.

(a) Subject to the following conditions, nonresidents shall be allowed a credit against the “net tax” (as defined by Section 17039) for net income taxes imposed by and paid to the state of residence (not including any preference, alternative, or minimum tax comparable to the tax imposed by Section 17062) on income taxable under this part:

(1) The credit shall be allowed only if the state of residence either does not tax income of residents of this state derived from sources within that state or allows residents of this state a credit against
 the taxes imposed by that state on such income for “net tax” (as defined by Section 17039) paid or payable thereon under this part.

(2) The credit shall not be allowed for taxes paid to a state which allows its residents a credit against the taxes imposed by that state for “net tax” (as defined by Section 17039) paid or payable under this part irrespective of whether its residents are allowed a credit against the taxes imposed by this part for income taxes paid to that state.

(3) Credit shall be allowed only for such proportion of the taxes paid to the state of residence (not including any preference, alternative, or minimum tax comparable to the tax imposed by Section 17062) as the income taxable under this part and also subject to tax in the state of residence bears to the entire income upon which the taxes paid to the state of residence are imposed.

(4) The credit shall not exceed such proportion of the “net tax” (as defined by Section 17039) payable under this part as the income subject to tax in the state of residence and also taxable under this part bears to the entire income taxable under this part.

(5) No credit shall be allowed under this section for any tax imposed by Section 17062.

(b) For purposes of this section, the amount of “net income taxes” paid to another state shall include the taxpayer’s pro rata share of any taxes on, or according to, or measured by, income or profits paid or accrued, which were paid by an S corporation, as provided by Section 18006.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1349, Sec. 9.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

18003.

For the purpose of this chapter an estate or trust is considered a resident of the state which taxes the income of the estate or trust irrespective of whether the income is derived from sources within that state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 321.)
-------------------------------------------

18004.

If an estate or trust is a resident of this State and also a resident of another state, it shall, notwithstanding the limitations contained in Sections 18001 and 18002, be allowed a credit against the taxes imposed by this part for net income taxes imposed by and paid to the other state, subject to the following conditions:

(a) Credit shall be allowed only for such proportion of the taxes paid to the other state as the income taxable under this part and also subject to tax in the other state bears to the entire income upon which the taxes paid to the other state are imposed.

(b) The credit shall not exceed such proportion of the tax payable under this part as the income subject to tax in the other state and also taxable under this part bears to the entire income taxable under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 321.)
-------------------------------------------

18005.

A resident beneficiary of an estate or trust who is taxable on the income of the estate or trust under Chapter 9 of this part shall, subject to the following conditions, be allowed a credit against the taxes imposed by this part on such income for net income taxes paid by the estate or trust to another state on such income:

(a) Credit shall be allowed only for such proportion of the tax paid to the other state by the estate or trust as the income of the estate or trust which is taxable to the beneficiary under this part and also taxed to the estate or trust in the other state bears to the entire income of
 the estate or trust upon which the taxes paid to the other state were imposed.

(b) The credit shall not exceed such proportion of the tax payable under this part as the income of the estate or trust which is taxable to the beneficiary under this part and also taxed to the estate or trust in the other state bears to the beneficiary’s entire income upon which the tax is imposed by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 215.)
-------------------------------------------

18006.

For purposes of determining a credit under Section 18001 (relating to residents) or Section 18002 (relating to nonresidents), both of the following apply:

(a) A member of a partnership is allowed to treat his, her, or its pro rata share of net income taxes paid to another state by the partnership as if those taxes had been paid directly by the partner.

(b) (1) A shareholder of a corporation that is an S
 corporation under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 23800) of Part 11 is allowed to treat his or her pro rata share of net income taxes paid to another state by the S corporation as if those taxes had been paid by the shareholder.

(2) This subdivision applies only if either of the following requirements is met:

(A) The state imposing the tax does not allow corporations to elect to be treated as an S corporation. 

(B) The state imposes a tax on S corporations and the corporation referred to in paragraph (1) has elected to be treated as an S corporation in the other state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18007.

If any taxes paid to another state for which a taxpayer has been allowed a credit under this chapter are at any time credited or refunded to the taxpayer, the taxpayer shall immediately report that fact to the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 321.)
-------------------------------------------

18008.

A tax equal to the credit allowed for the taxes credited or refunded by the other state is due and payable from the taxpayer upon notice and demand from the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 215.)
-------------------------------------------

18009.

Interest shall be assessed, collected and paid in the same manner as the tax at the adjusted annual rate established pursuant to Section 19521 from the date the credit was allowed under this part to the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 16.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

18011.

The credit against the taxes imposed by this part for net income taxes paid to another state shall not be allowed to any taxpayer or any class of taxpayers if the allowance of the credit will result in an invalid or illegal discrimination against another taxpayer or another class of taxpayers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 215.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Gain or Loss on Disposition of Property [18031. - 18045.]

18031.

Subchapter O of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to gain or loss on disposition of property, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 873, Sec. 27.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

18031.5.

(a) The amendments made by Section 13303(a) and (b) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exchange of real property held for productive use or investment, shall apply, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(b) (1) (A) In the case of a taxpayer who is a head of household, a surviving spouse, or spouses filing a joint return, this section shall only apply to those taxpayers with adjusted gross income, as defined in Section 17072, of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more for the taxable year in which the exchange begins.

(B) In the case of a taxpayer filing an individual return, this section shall only apply to those taxpayers with adjusted gross income, as defined in Section 17072, of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or more for the taxable year in which the exchange begins.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

(c) (1) This section shall apply to exchanges completed after January 10, 2019.

(2) This section shall not apply to an exchange where the property to be disposed of by the taxpayer in the exchange is disposed of by that taxpayer on or before January 10, 2019, or where the
 property to be received by the taxpayer in the exchange is received by that taxpayer on or before January 10, 2019.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 58.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18032.

(a) If gain or loss from the exchange of property in this state of a taxpayer is not recognized under this part because of Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exchange of property held for productive use or investment, for a taxable year and the property acquired in that exchange is located outside of this state, the taxpayer shall file an information return with the Franchise Tax Board for the taxable year of the exchange and for each subsequent
 taxable year in which the gain or loss from that exchange has not been recognized, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) If a taxpayer fails to file an information return required pursuant to subdivision (a), and fails to file a return required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), the Franchise Tax Board may make an estimate of the net income, from any available information, including the amount of gain described in subdivision (a), and may propose to assess the amount of tax, interest, and penalties due in the same manner as Section 19087.

(c) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(d) This section shall apply to exchanges of property that occur in taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 26, Sec. 4.   (AB 92)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

18036.

(a) In addition to the adjustments to basis provided by Section 1016(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, a proper adjustment shall also be made for amounts allowed as deductions as deferred expenses under subdivision (b) of former Section 17689 or former Section 17689.5 (relating to certain exploration expenditures) and resulting in a reduction of the taxpayer’s taxes under this part, but not less than the amounts allowable under those sections for the taxable year and prior years. A proper adjustment shall also be made for amounts deducted under Section 17252.5, 17265, or 17266.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 164(a) and 1016(a)
 of the Internal Revenue Code, no adjustment to basis shall be made for any of the following:

(1) Abandonment fees paid in respect of property on which the open-space easement is terminated under Section 51061 or 51093 of the Government Code.

(2) Tax recoupment fees paid under Section 51142 of the Government Code.

(3) Sales or use tax which is paid or incurred by the taxpayer in connection with the acquisition of property for which a tax credit is claimed pursuant to Section 17052.13.

(c) The provisions of Section 1016(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to increase in basis of property on which additional estate tax is imposed, shall be applicable.

(d) The amendments made to Section 1016 of the Internal Revenue Code by Section 1913(a) of Public Law 102-486, relating to deduction for clean-fuel vehicles and certain refueling property, shall apply to property placed in service after June 30, 1993, without respect to taxable year.

(e) The provisions of Section 1016(a)(38) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to basis adjustments for capital gains invested in opportunity zones, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 59.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18036.5.

In addition to the adjustments to basis provided by Section 1016(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, a proper adjustment shall also be made in the case of property the acquisition of which resulted under Section 18038.5 in the nonrecognition of any part of the gain realized on the sale of other property, to the extent provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 18038.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18037.

An election made by a taxpayer pursuant to Section 1033(g)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the election to treat outdoor advertising displays as real property, may not be denied because the taxpayer has, on his or her federal return, elected to expense the asset.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18037.5.

The amendments made by Section 844 of the Pension Protection Act of 2006 (Public Law 109-280) to Section 1035 of the Internal Revenue Code, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 37.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18038.

Section 1040 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to transfer of certain real property, does not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18038.4.

Section 1045 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to rollover of gain from qualified small business stock to another qualified small business stock, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 40.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18039.

Section 1052 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to basis established by prior revenue acts, is modified as follows:

(a) Section 1052(c) of the Internal Revenue Code does not apply.

(b) If the property was acquired, after February 28, 1913, in a transaction to which the Personal Income Tax Law of 1954 applied, and the basis thereof, for purposes of the Personal Income Tax Law of 1954, was prescribed by Section 17747, 17751,
 17755, 17756, 17757, 17758, or 17788 of that law, then for purposes of this part the basis shall be the same as the basis therein prescribed in the Personal Income Tax Law of 1954.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18041.5.

(a) No gain shall be recognized with respect to a sale of an assisted housing development to a tenant association, nonprofit organization, profit-motivated organization or individual, or public agency which obligates itself and any successors in interest to maintain the assisted housing development affordable to persons or families of lower income or very low income for either a period of 30 years from the date of sale or the remaining term of existing federal government assistance as listed in subdivision (a) of Section 65863.10 of the Government Code, whichever is greater, provided that all of the
 proceeds from the sale are reinvested in residential real property, other than a personal residence, in this state within two years after the sale. This obligation shall be recorded at the time of sale in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the development is located.

(b) No gain shall be recognized with respect to a sale of a majority or more of units in an assisted housing development converted to condominium interests, to a tenant association, nonprofit organization, profit-motivated organization or individual, or public agency which obligates itself and any successors in interest to maintain the condominiums affordable to persons or families of lower income or very low income for either a period of 30 years from the date of sale or the remaining term of existing federal government assistance as listed in subdivision (a) of Section 65863.10 of the Government Code, provided that all of the proceeds from the sale are
 reinvested in residential real property, other than a personal residence, in this state within two years after the sale. This obligation shall be recorded at the time of sale in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the development is located.

(c) No gain shall be recognized with respect to a sale of real property to a majority or more of existing lower income and very low income residents of that property, provided that all of the proceeds from the sale are reinvested in residential real property, other than a personal residence, in this state within two years after the sale.
